Florida, session 2026, SB340.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 11 12 Section 1.âParagraph (e) is added to subsection (1) of 13 section 464.008, Florida Statutes, to read: 14 464.008âLicensure by examination.â 15 (1)âAny person desiring to be licensed as a registered 16 nurse or licensed practical nurse shall apply to the department 17 to take the licensure examination. The department shall examine 18 each applicant who: 19 (e)âBeginning July 1, 2027, has completed a 2-hour course 20 on human trafficking. The course must include the content 21 required for the human trafficking continuing education course 22 required under s. 464.013(3)(c). 23 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.